Washington statutes.
RCW 15.64.030

Studies of farm marketing problems—Rules.

The director shall enact rules and regulations governing the pursuit of technical studies of farm marketing problems. Said studies shall be under the supervision of the director of the experimental station of Washington State University. The extension service of Washington State University shall provide for dissemination to the public of knowledge gained by such studies.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.64.030. Prior: 1947 c 280 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-2.]